Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1,117
Brand inspection area; intermingling of livestock; effect.

No consignment of livestock within, entering into, or passing through the brand inspection area, after having been inspected by a brand inspector, shall be permitted to intermingle with any other livestock located within the brand inspection area. If, at any time after brand inspection has been performed or a certificate of inspection has been issued on any shipment of livestock, the livestock become intermingled with other livestock located within the brand inspection area, the original brand inspection is void and before further movement of the livestock out of the brand inspection area may be made, reinspection for identification of brands is required. A brand inspector may require reinspection if he or she has reason to believe a consignment of livestock has become intermingled.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 48.